Illinois, session 104th, HB5277.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6z-22 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-22)  (from Ch. 127, par. 142z-22)7    Sec. 6z-22. Viable public guardianship and advocacy 8programs, including the public guardianship programs created 9and supervised in probate proceedings in State courts, are 10essential to the administration of justice and operation of 11the court to ensure that incapacitated persons and their 12estates are protected regardless of their individual capacity 13to access the courts. Providing independent legal 14representation for individuals named in proceedings initiated 15under the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code is 16essential to the administration of justice and operation of 17courts so that an individual named in such proceedings, 18regardless of resources, is afforded counsel that is free of 19conflicting duties and charged with insuring compliance with 20the Code's requirements, which is a necessary safeguard to 21prevent the mental health and developmental disabilities 22systems from become a tool to oppress rather than serve 23society. To defray the expense of maintaining and operating   HB5277- 2 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1the divisions and programs of the Guardianship and Advocacy 2Commission and to support viable guardianship and advocacy 3programs throughout the State, each circuit court clerk must 4remit a portion of the filing and appearance fees, as provided 5in Section 27.1b of the Clerk of Courts Act, to the State 6Treasurer for deposit into the Guardianship and Advocacy Fund. 7All fees or other monies received by the Guardianship and 8Advocacy Commission incident to the provision of legal or 9guardianship services to eligible persons or wards pursuant to 10subsection (i) of Section 5 of the Guardianship and Advocacy 11Act shall be paid into the Guardianship and Advocacy Fund.12    Appropriations for the improvement, development, addition 13or expansion of legal and guardianship services for eligible 14persons or wards pursuant to Section 5 of the Guardianship and 15Advocacy Act or for the financing of any program designed to 16provide such improvement, development, addition or expansion 17of services or for expenses incurred in administering the 18Human Rights Authority, Legal Advocacy Service and Office of 19State Guardian are payable from the Guardianship and Advocacy 20Fund.21(Source: P.A. 86-448; 86-1028.) 22    Section 10. The Clerks of Courts Act is amended by 23changing Section 27.1b as follows: 24    (705 ILCS 105/27.1b)  HB5277- 3 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1    Sec. 27.1b. Circuit court clerk fees. Notwithstanding any 2other provision of law, all fees charged by the clerks of the 3circuit court for the services described in this Section shall 4be established, collected, and disbursed in accordance with 5this Section. Except as otherwise specified in this Section, 6all fees under this Section shall be paid in advance and 7disbursed by each clerk on a monthly basis. In a county with a 8population of over 3,000,000, units of local government and 9school districts shall not be required to pay fees under this 10Section in advance and the clerk shall instead send an 11itemized bill to the unit of local government or school 12district, within 30 days of the fee being incurred, and the 13unit of local government or school district shall be allowed 14at least 30 days from the date of the itemized bill to pay; 15these payments shall be disbursed by each clerk on a monthly 16basis. Unless otherwise specified in this Section, the amount 17of a fee shall be determined by ordinance or resolution of the 18county board and remitted to the county treasurer to be used 19for purposes related to the operation of the court system in 20the county. In a county with a population of over 3,000,000, 21any amount retained by the clerk of the circuit court or 22remitted to the county treasurer shall be subject to 23appropriation by the county board.24    (a) Civil cases. The fee for filing a complaint, petition, 25or other pleading initiating a civil action shall be as set 26forth in the applicable schedule under this subsection in   HB5277- 4 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1accordance with case categories established by the Supreme 2Court in schedules. 3        (1) SCHEDULE 1: not to exceed a total of $371 $366 in a 4    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 5    exceed $321 $316 in any other county, except as applied to 6    units of local government and school districts in counties 7    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 8    exceed $195 $190 through December 31, 2021 and $184 on and 9    after January 1, 2022. The fees collected under this 10    schedule shall be disbursed as follows:11            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 12        to exceed $55 in a county with a population of 13        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $45 in 14        any other county determined by the clerk with the 15        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 16        automation, court document storage, and administrative 17        purposes.18            (B) The clerk shall remit up to $26 $21 to the 19        State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 20        appropriate amounts, in accordance with the clerk's 21        instructions, as follows:22                (i) up to $10, as specified by the Supreme 23            Court in accordance with Part 10A of Article II of 24            the Code of Civil Procedure, into the Mandatory 25            Arbitration Fund;26                (ii) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund; and  HB5277- 5 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1                (iii) $5 into the Guardianship and Advocacy 2            Fund; and 3                (iv) (iii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 4            Purposes Fund.5            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 6        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $290 in a county 7        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 8        not to exceed $250 in any other county, as specified by 9        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 10        for purposes related to the operation of the court 11        system in the county.12        (2) SCHEDULE 2: not to exceed a total of $362 $357 in a 13    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 14    exceed $266 in any other county, except as applied to 15    units of local government and school districts in counties 16    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 17    exceed $190 through December 31, 2021 and $184 on and 18    after January 1, 2022. The fees collected under this 19    schedule shall be disbursed as follows:20            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 21        to exceed $55 in a county with a population of 22        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $45 in 23        any other county determined by the clerk with the 24        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 25        automation, court document storage, and administrative 26        purposes.  HB5277- 6 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1            (B) The clerk shall remit up to $21 to the State 2        Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 3        appropriate amounts, in accordance with the clerk's 4        instructions, as follows:5                (i) up to $10, as specified by the Supreme 6            Court in accordance with Part 10A of Article II of 7            the Code of Civil Procedure, into the Mandatory 8            Arbitration Fund;9                (ii) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund: and10                (iii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 11            Purposes Fund.12            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 13        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $281 in a county 14        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 15        not to exceed $200 in any other county, as specified by 16        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 17        for purposes related to the operation of the court 18        system in the county.19        (3) SCHEDULE 3: not to exceed a total of $270 $265 in a 20    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 21    exceed $94 $89 in any other county, except as applied to 22    units of local government and school districts in counties 23    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 24    exceed $195 $190 through December 31, 2021 and $184 on and 25    after January 1, 2022. The fees collected under this 26    schedule shall be disbursed as follows:  HB5277- 7 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 2        to exceed $55 in a county with a population of 3        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $22 in 4        any other county determined by the clerk with the 5        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 6        automation, court document storage, and administrative 7        purposes.8            (B) The clerk shall remit $16 $11 to the State 9        Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 10        appropriate amounts in accordance with the clerk's 11        instructions, as follows:12                (i) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund; and13                (ii) $5 into the Guardianship and Advocacy 14            Fund; and 15                (iii) (ii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 16            Purposes Fund.17            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 18        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $199 in a county 19        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 20        not to exceed $56 in any other county, as specified by 21        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 22        for purposes related to the operation of the court 23        system in the county.24        (4) SCHEDULE 4: $0.25    (b) Appearance. The fee for filing an appearance in a 26civil action, including a cannabis civil law action under the   HB5277- 8 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1Cannabis Control Act, shall be as set forth in the applicable 2schedule under this subsection in accordance with case 3categories established by the Supreme Court in schedules.4        (1) SCHEDULE 1: not to exceed a total of $235 $230 in a 5    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 6    exceed $196 $191 in any other county, except as applied to 7    units of local government and school districts in counties 8    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 9    exceed $80 $75. The fees collected under this schedule 10    shall be disbursed as follows:11            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 12        to exceed $50 in a county with a population of 13        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $45 in 14        any other county determined by the clerk with the 15        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 16        automation, court document storage, and administrative 17        purposes.18            (B) The clerk shall remit up to $26 $21 to the 19        State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 20        appropriate amounts, in accordance with the clerk's 21        instructions, as follows:22                (i) up to $10, as specified by the Supreme 23            Court in accordance with Part 10A of Article II of 24            the Code of Civil Procedure, into the Mandatory 25            Arbitration Fund;26                (ii) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund; and  HB5277- 9 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1                (iii) $5 into the Guardianship and Advocacy 2            Fund; and 3                (iv) (iii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 4            Purposes Fund.5            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 6        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $159 in a county 7        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 8        not to exceed $125 in any other county, as specified by 9        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 10        for purposes related to the operation of the court 11        system in the county.12        (2) SCHEDULE 2: not to exceed a total of $135 $130 in a 13    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 14    exceed $114 $109 in any other county, except as applied to 15    units of local government and school districts in counties 16    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 17    exceed $80 $75. The fees collected under this schedule 18    shall be disbursed as follows:19            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 20        to exceed $50 in a county with a population of 21        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $10 in 22        any other county determined by the clerk with the 23        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 24        automation, court document storage, and administrative 25        purposes.26            (B) The clerk shall remit up to $14 $9 to the State   HB5277- 10 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1        Treasurer. The , which the State Treasurer shall 2        deposit the appropriate amounts, in accordance with 3        the clerk's instructions, as follows: into the Supreme 4        Court Special Purposes Fund.5                (i) $5 into the Guardianship and Advocacy 6            Fund; and7                (ii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 8            Purposes Fund. 9            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 10        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $71 in a county 11        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 12        not to exceed $90 in any other county, as specified by 13        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 14        for purposes related to the operation of the court 15        system in the county.16        (3) SCHEDULE 3: $0.17    (b-5) Kane County and Will County. In Kane County and Will 18County civil cases, there is an additional fee of up to $30 as 19set by the county board under Section 5-1101.3 of the Counties 20Code to be paid by each party at the time of filing the first 21pleading, paper, or other appearance; provided that no 22additional fee shall be required if more than one party is 23represented in a single pleading, paper, or other appearance. 24Distribution of fees collected under this subsection (b-5) 25shall be as provided in Section 5-1101.3 of the Counties Code. 26    (c) Counterclaim or third party complaint. When any   HB5277- 11 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1defendant files a counterclaim or third party complaint, as 2part of the defendant's answer or otherwise, the defendant 3shall pay a filing fee for each counterclaim or third party 4complaint in an amount equal to the filing fee the defendant 5would have had to pay had the defendant brought a separate 6action for the relief sought in the counterclaim or third 7party complaint, less the amount of the appearance fee, if 8any, that the defendant has already paid in the action in which 9the counterclaim or third party complaint is filed.10    (d) Alias summons. The clerk shall collect a fee not to 11exceed $6 in a county with a population of 3,000,000 or more 12and not to exceed $5 in any other county for each alias summons 13or citation issued by the clerk, except as applied to units of 14local government and school districts in counties with more 15than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed $5 for each 16alias summons or citation issued by the clerk.17    (e) Jury services. The clerk shall collect, in addition to 18other fees allowed by law, a sum not to exceed $212.50, as a 19fee for the services of a jury in every civil action not 20quasi-criminal in its nature and not a proceeding for the 21exercise of the right of eminent domain and in every other 22action wherein the right of trial by jury is or may be given by 23law. The jury fee shall be paid by the party demanding a jury 24at the time of filing the jury demand. If the fee is not paid 25by either party, no jury shall be called in the action or 26proceeding, and the action or proceeding shall be tried by the   HB5277- 12 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1court without a jury.2    (f) Change of venue. In connection with a change of venue:3        (1) The clerk of the jurisdiction from which the case 4    is transferred may charge a fee, not to exceed $40, for the 5    preparation and certification of the record; and6        (2) The clerk of the jurisdiction to which the case is 7    transferred may charge the same filing fee as if it were 8    the commencement of a new suit.9    (g) Petition to vacate or modify.10        (1) In a proceeding involving a petition to vacate or 11    modify any final judgment or order filed within 30 days 12    after the judgment or order was entered, except for an 13    eviction case, small claims case, petition to reopen an 14    estate, petition to modify, terminate, or enforce a 15    judgment or order for child or spousal support, or 16    petition to modify, suspend, or terminate an order for 17    withholding, the fee shall not exceed $60 in a county with 18    a population of 3,000,000 or more and shall not exceed $50 19    in any other county, except as applied to units of local 20    government and school districts in counties with more than 21    3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed $50.22        (2) In a proceeding involving a petition to vacate or 23    modify any final judgment or order filed more than 30 days 24    after the judgment or order was entered, except for a 25    petition to modify, terminate, or enforce a judgment or 26    order for child or spousal support, or petition to modify,   HB5277- 13 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1    suspend, or terminate an order for withholding, the fee 2    shall not exceed $75.3        (3) In a proceeding involving a motion to vacate or 4    amend a final order, motion to vacate an ex parte 5    judgment, judgment of forfeiture, or "failure to appear" 6    or "failure to comply" notices sent to the Secretary of 7    State, the fee shall equal $40.8    (h) Appeals preparation. The fee for preparation of a 9record on appeal shall be based on the number of pages, as 10follows:11        (1) if the record contains no more than 100 pages, the 12    fee shall not exceed $70 in a county with a population of 13    3,000,000 or more and shall not exceed $50 in any other 14    county;15        (2) if the record contains between 100 and 200 pages, 16    the fee shall not exceed $100; and17        (3) if the record contains 200 or more pages, the 18    clerk may collect an additional fee not to exceed 25 cents 19    per page.20    (i) Remands. In any cases remanded to the circuit court 21from the Supreme Court or the appellate court for a new trial, 22the clerk shall reinstate the case with either its original 23number or a new number. The clerk shall not charge any new or 24additional fee for the reinstatement. Upon reinstatement, the 25clerk shall advise the parties of the reinstatement. Parties 26shall have the same right to a jury trial on remand and   HB5277- 14 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1reinstatement that they had before the appeal, and no 2additional or new fee or charge shall be made for a jury trial 3after remand.4    (j) Garnishment, wage deduction, and citation. In 5garnishment affidavit, wage deduction affidavit, and citation 6petition proceedings:7        (1) if the amount in controversy in the proceeding is 8    not more than $1,000, the fee may not exceed $35 in a 9    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and may not 10    exceed $15 in any other county, except as applied to units 11    of local government and school districts in counties with 12    more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed 13    $15;14        (2) if the amount in controversy in the proceeding is 15    greater than $1,000 and not more than $5,000, the fee may 16    not exceed $45 in a county with a population of 3,000,000 17    or more and may not exceed $30 in any other county, except 18    as applied to units of local government and school 19    districts in counties with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants 20    an amount not to exceed $30; and21        (3) if the amount in controversy in the proceeding is 22    greater than $5,000, the fee may not exceed $65 in a county 23    with a population of 3,000,000 or more and may not exceed 24    $50 in any other county, except as applied to units of 25    local government and school districts in counties with 26    more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed   HB5277- 15 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1    $50.2    (j-5) Debt collection. In any proceeding to collect a debt 3subject to the exception in item (ii) of subparagraph (A-5) of 4paragraph (1) of subsection (z) of this Section, the circuit 5court shall order and the clerk shall collect from each 6judgment debtor a fee of: 7        (1) $35 if the amount in controversy in the proceeding 8    is not more than $1,000;9        (2) $45 if the amount in controversy in the proceeding 10    is greater than $1,000 and not more than $5,000; and 11        (3) $65 if the amount in controversy in the proceeding 12    is greater than $5,000. 13    (k) Collections.14        (1) For all collections made of others, except the 15    State and county and except in maintenance or child 16    support cases, the clerk may collect a fee of up to 2.5% of 17    the amount collected and turned over.18        (2) In child support and maintenance cases, the clerk 19    may collect an annual fee of up to $36 from the person 20    making payment for maintaining child support records and 21    the processing of support orders to the State of Illinois 22    KIDS system and the recording of payments issued by the 23    State Disbursement Unit for the official record of the 24    Court. This fee is in addition to and separate from 25    amounts ordered to be paid as maintenance or child support 26    and shall be deposited into a Separate Maintenance and   HB5277- 16 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1    Child Support Collection Fund, of which the clerk shall be 2    the custodian, ex officio, to be used by the clerk to 3    maintain child support orders and record all payments 4    issued by the State Disbursement Unit for the official 5    record of the Court. The clerk may recover from the person 6    making the maintenance or child support payment any 7    additional cost incurred in the collection of this annual 8    fee.9        (3) The clerk may collect a fee of $5 for 10    certifications made to the Secretary of State as provided 11    in Section 7-703 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and this 12    fee shall be deposited into the Separate Maintenance and 13    Child Support Collection Fund.14        (4) In proceedings to foreclose the lien of delinquent 15    real estate taxes, State's Attorneys shall receive a fee 16    of 10% of the total amount realized from the sale of real 17    estate sold in the proceedings. The clerk shall collect 18    the fee from the total amount realized from the sale of the 19    real estate sold in the proceedings and remit to the 20    County Treasurer to be credited to the earnings of the 21    Office of the State's Attorney. 22    (l) Mailing. The fee for the clerk mailing documents shall 23not exceed $10 plus the cost of postage.24    (m) Certified copies. The fee for each certified copy of a 25judgment, after the first copy, shall not exceed $10.26    (n) Certification, authentication, and reproduction.  HB5277- 17 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1        (1) The fee for each certification or authentication 2    for taking the acknowledgment of a deed or other 3    instrument in writing with the seal of office shall not 4    exceed $6.5        (2) The fee for reproduction of any document contained 6    in the clerk's files shall not exceed:7            (A) $2 for the first page;8            (B) 50 cents per page for the next 19 pages; and9            (C) 25 cents per page for all additional pages.10    (o) Record search. For each record search, within a 11division or municipal district, the clerk may collect a search 12fee not to exceed $6 for each year searched.13    (p) Hard copy. For each page of hard copy print output, 14when case records are maintained on an automated medium, the 15clerk may collect a fee not to exceed $10 in a county with a 16population of 3,000,000 or more and not to exceed $6 in any 17other county, except as applied to units of local government 18and school districts in counties with more than 3,000,000 19inhabitants an amount not to exceed $6.20    (q) Index inquiry and other records. No fee shall be 21charged for a single plaintiff and defendant index inquiry or 22single case record inquiry when this request is made in person 23and the records are maintained in a current automated medium, 24and when no hard copy print output is requested. The fees to be 25charged for management records, multiple case records, and 26multiple journal records may be specified by the Chief Judge   HB5277- 18 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1pursuant to the guidelines for access and dissemination of 2information approved by the Supreme Court.3    (r) Performing a marriage. There shall be a $10 fee for 4performing a marriage in court.5    (s) Voluntary assignment. For filing each deed of 6voluntary assignment, the clerk shall collect a fee not to 7exceed $20. For recording a deed of voluntary assignment, the 8clerk shall collect a fee not to exceed 50 cents for each 100 9words. Exceptions filed to claims presented to an assignee of 10a debtor who has made a voluntary assignment for the benefit of 11creditors shall be considered and treated, for the purpose of 12taxing costs therein, as actions in which the party or parties 13filing the exceptions shall be considered as party or parties 14plaintiff, and the claimant or claimants as party or parties 15defendant, and those parties respectively shall pay to the 16clerk the same fees as provided by this Section to be paid in 17other actions.18    (t) Expungement petition. Except as provided in Sections 191-19 and 5-915 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the clerk may 20collect a fee not to exceed $60 for each expungement petition 21filed and an additional fee not to exceed $4 for each certified 22copy of an order to expunge arrest records.23    (u) Transcripts of judgment. For the filing of a 24transcript of judgment, the clerk may collect the same fee as 25if it were the commencement of a new suit.26    (v) Probate filings.  HB5277- 19 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1        (1) For each account (other than one final account) 2    filed in the estate of a decedent, or ward, the fee shall 3    not exceed $25. No fee may be charged for accounts filed 4    for guardianships established for minors pursuant to 5    Article XI of the Probate Act of 1975 or for disabled 6    adults under Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975. 7        (2) For filing a claim in an estate when the amount 8    claimed is greater than $150 and not more than $500, the 9    fee shall not exceed $40 in a county with a population of 10    3,000,000 or more and shall not exceed $25 in any other 11    county; when the amount claimed is greater than $500 and 12    not more than $10,000, the fee shall not exceed $55 in a 13    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and shall 14    not exceed $40 in any other county; and when the amount 15    claimed is more than $10,000, the fee shall not exceed $75 16    in a county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and 17    shall not exceed $60 in any other county; except the court 18    in allowing a claim may add to the amount allowed the 19    filing fee paid by the claimant.20        (3) For filing in an estate a claim, petition, or 21    supplemental proceeding based upon an action seeking 22    equitable relief including the construction or contest of 23    a will, enforcement of a contract to make a will, and 24    proceedings involving testamentary trusts or the 25    appointment of testamentary trustees, the fee shall not 26    exceed $60.  HB5277- 20 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1        (4) There shall be no fee for filing in an estate: (i) 2    the appearance of any person for the purpose of consent; 3    or (ii) the appearance of an executor, administrator, 4    administrator to collect, guardian, guardian ad litem, or 5    special administrator.6        (5) For each jury demand, the fee shall not exceed 7    $137.50.8        (6) For each certified copy of letters of office, of 9    court order, or other certification, the fee shall not 10    exceed $2 per page.11        (7) For each exemplification, the fee shall not exceed 12    $2, plus the fee for certification.13        (8) The executor, administrator, guardian, petitioner, 14    or other interested person or his or her attorney shall 15    pay the cost of publication by the clerk directly to the 16    newspaper.17        (9) The person on whose behalf a charge is incurred 18    for witness, court reporter, appraiser, or other 19    miscellaneous fees shall pay the same directly to the 20    person entitled thereto.21        (10) The executor, administrator, guardian, 22    petitioner, or other interested person or his or her 23    attorney shall pay to the clerk all postage charges 24    incurred by the clerk in mailing petitions, orders, 25    notices, or other documents pursuant to the provisions of 26    the Probate Act of 1975.  HB5277- 21 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1    (w) Corrections of numbers. For correction of the case 2number, case title, or attorney computer identification 3number, if required by rule of court, on any document filed in 4the clerk's office, to be charged against the party that filed 5the document, the fee shall not exceed $25.6    (x) Miscellaneous.7        (1) Interest earned on any fees collected by the clerk 8    shall be turned over to the county general fund as an 9    earning of the office.10        (2) For any check, draft, or other bank instrument 11    returned to the clerk for non-sufficient funds, account 12    closed, or payment stopped, the clerk shall collect a fee 13    of $25.14    (y) Other fees. Any fees not covered in this Section shall 15be set by rule or administrative order of the circuit court 16with the approval of the Administrative Office of the Illinois 17Courts. The clerk of the circuit court may provide services in 18connection with the operation of the clerk's office, other 19than those services mentioned in this Section, as may be 20requested by the public and agreed to by the clerk and approved 21by the Chief Judge. Any charges for additional services shall 22be as agreed to between the clerk and the party making the 23request and approved by the Chief Judge. Nothing in this 24subsection shall be construed to require any clerk to provide 25any service not otherwise required by law.26    (y-5) Unpaid fees. Unless a court ordered payment schedule   HB5277- 22 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1is implemented or the fee requirements of this Section are 2waived under a court order, the clerk of the circuit court may 3add to any unpaid fees and costs under this Section a 4delinquency amount equal to 5% of the unpaid fees that remain 5unpaid after 30 days, 10% of the unpaid fees that remain unpaid 6after 60 days, and 15% of the unpaid fees that remain unpaid 7after 90 days. Notice to those parties may be made by signage 8posting or publication. The additional delinquency amounts 9collected under this Section shall be deposited into the 10Circuit Court Clerk Operations and Administration Fund and 11used to defray additional administrative costs incurred by the 12clerk of the circuit court in collecting unpaid fees and 13costs. 14    (z) Exceptions.15        (1) No fee authorized by this Section shall apply to:16            (A) police departments or other law enforcement 17        agencies. In this Section, "law enforcement agency" 18        means: an agency of the State or agency of a unit of 19        local government which is vested by law or ordinance 20        with the duty to maintain public order and to enforce 21        criminal laws or ordinances; the Attorney General; or 22        any State's Attorney;23            (A-5) any unit of local government or school 24        district, except in counties having a population of 25        500,000 or more the county board may by resolution set 26        fees for units of local government or school districts   HB5277- 23 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1        no greater than the minimum fees applicable in 2        counties with a population less than 3,000,000; 3        provided however, no fee may be charged to any unit of 4        local government or school district in connection with 5        any action which, in whole or in part, is: (i) to 6        enforce an ordinance; (ii) to collect a debt; or (iii) 7        under the Administrative Review Law; 8            (B) any action instituted by the corporate 9        authority of a municipality with more than 1,000,000 10        inhabitants under Section 11-31-1 of the Illinois 11        Municipal Code and any action instituted under 12        subsection (b) of Section 11-31-1 of the Illinois 13        Municipal Code by a private owner or tenant of real 14        property within 1,200 feet of a dangerous or unsafe 15        building seeking an order compelling the owner or 16        owners of the building to take any of the actions 17        authorized under that subsection;18            (C) any commitment petition, petition for 19        discharge petition, or petition for an order 20        authorizing the administration of psychotropic 21        medication or electroconvulsive therapy under the 22        Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code;23            (D) a petitioner in any order of protection 24        proceeding, including, but not limited to, fees for 25        filing, modifying, withdrawing, certifying, or 26        photocopying petitions for orders of protection,   HB5277- 24 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1        issuing alias summons, any related filing service, or 2        certifying, modifying, vacating, or photocopying any 3        orders of protection;4            (E) proceedings for the appointment of a 5        confidential intermediary under the Adoption Act;6            (F) a minor subject to Article III, IV, or V of the 7        Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the minor's parent, 8        guardian, or legal custodian; or9            (G) a minor under the age of 18 transferred to 10        adult court or excluded from juvenile court 11        jurisdiction under Article V of the Juvenile Court Act 12        of 1987, or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal 13        custodian. 14        (2) No fee other than the filing fee contained in the 15    applicable schedule in subsection (a) shall be charged to 16    any person in connection with an adoption proceeding.17        (3) Upon good cause shown, the court may waive any 18    fees associated with a special needs adoption. The term 19    "special needs adoption" has the meaning provided by the 20    Illinois Department of Children and Family Services.21        (4) No fee may be charged for the filing of an 22    appearance by any defendant in a small claim proceeding. 23    As used in this Section, "small claim" means a proceeding 24    as defined in Supreme Court Rule 281. 25(Source: P.A. 103-4, eff. 5-31-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 26103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 104-120, eff. 1-1-26.)   HB5277- 25 -LRB104 18252 JRC 31691 b1    (705 ILCS 105/27.3f rep.)2    Section 15. The Clerks of Courts Act is amended by 3repealing Section 27.3f.